Colorado, session 2026A, HB1196.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Safe and stable housing is essential to the health, safety, and
economic security of individuals and families in Colorado;
(b) Everyone has the right to fair treatment and transparency in
housing, and affording tenants better opportunities to understand the
information landlords access and the criteria used to grant or deny
applications will reduce uncertainty, arbitrary denials, and discrimination;
(c) Landlords often rely on tenant screening processes that use
prospective tenants' personal and financial data, while prospective tenants
are not always informed about the type of information landlords review or
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

how it is used in decision-making;
(d) This imbalance of information can create confusion, limit
meaningful access to housing, and contribute to inconsistent or unfair
outcomes for tenants;
(e) Court records related to eviction proceedings can include
sensitive personal identifying information and are often publicly accessible,
meaning those records can expose tenants to identity theft, financial harm,
and long-term barriers to accessing housing and economic stability; and
(f) The combination of the lack of transparency in tenant screenings
and insufficient protections for personal identifying information in eviction
proceedings create unnecessary barriers to housing and undermine public
confidence in the fairness of the housing system.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that requiring
landlords to provide transparency in tenant screening practices and to
protect personal identifying information in eviction proceedings is essential
to protecting the rights, privacy, and dignity of all renters in Colorado.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-40-110.2 as
follows:
13-40-110.2. Personal identifying information in eviction court
filings - landlord's duties - definition.
(1) A LANDLORD SHALL COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE COURT RULES
GOVERNING THE PROTECTION AND REDACTION OF PERSONAL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION IN EVICTION FILINGS.
(2) A LANDLORD SHALL REDACT PERSONAL IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION FROM ANY SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS SUBMITTED TO A COURT
THAT MAY BECOME PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE. A LANDLORD MAY SUBMIT
PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION IN A CONFIDENTIAL MANNER
CONSISTENT WITH JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT PROCEDURES IF A COURT REQUIRES
SUCH INFORMATION.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A LANDLORD FROM
INCLUDING PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION EXPLICITLY REQUIRED BY
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1196

A COURT. ALL OTHER SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS SUBMITTED MUST COMPLY
WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION" INCLUDES A:
(a) SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(b) BIRTH DATE;
(c) DRIVER'S LICENSE NUMBER;
(d) STATE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(e) BANK ACCOUNT NUMBER;
(f) CREDIT CARD NUMBER; AND
(g) DEBIT CARD NUMBER.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 38-12-904, add (1.7)
as follows:
38-12-904. Consideration of rental applications - limitations -
portable tenant screening report - notice to prospective tenants - denial
notice.
(1.7) (a) A LANDLORD SHALL INCLUDE IN ALL RENTAL APPLICATIONS:
(I) A NOTICE TO PROSPECTIVE TENANTS REGARDING THE
INFORMATION AND DATA THE LANDLORD WILL ATTEMPT TO ACCESS WHEN
CONDUCTING A TENANT SCREENING;
(II) A GENERAL DESCRIPTION OF THE FACTORS THE LANDLORD WILL
CONSIDER WHEN EVALUATING A RENTAL APPLICATION, INCLUDING A
PROSPECTIVE TENANT'S CREDIT HISTORY, RENTAL HISTORY, INCOME, AND
CRIMINAL BACKGROUND, IF APPLICABLE; AND
(III) WHETHER THE LANDLORD USES A THIRD-PARTY TENANT
SCREENING SERVICE, AND IF SO, THE NAME OF THE SERVICE.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1196

(b) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION (1.7) REQUIRES A LANDLORD TO
ADOPT OR DISCLOSE FIXED DISQUALIFYING CRITERIA.
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1196

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1196